en: chicken, chickens
af: hoender
ak: akokɔ
am: ዶሮ
ar: دجاج
as: কুকুৰা
av: ГӀанкӀу
ay: Chiwchi
az: Toyuq
ba: Тауыҡ
be: Курыца
bg: кокошка, пиле
bn: মুরগি
bo: བྱ་ཏེ་
br: yar
bs: Kokoška
ca: Pollastre, gall
ce: Kotam
cs: kur
cy: Iâr
da: høns
de: Hühnchen, Huhn, Hühner, hähnchen
ee: Koklo
el: Όρνιθα
eo: koko
es: pollo
et: Kana
eu: oilo
fa: مرغ خانگی
fi: kana, kanat, broileri
fj: Toa
fr: poulet, poulets, poule
ga: Sicín
gd: cearc
gl: Galo
gn: Ryguasu
ha: Kaza
he: תרנגול הבית
hi: मुर्गी
hr: kokoš, kokošji, pileći, piletina
hu: Csirkék, csirke, házityúk
hy: հավ
ia: gallina
id: Ayam
io: hano
is: Kjúklingur
it: Polli, pollo, gallina, galline
iu: ᐊ'ᐊ'ᐋᒃ
ja: ニワトリ, チキン
jv: Pitik
ka: ქათამი
kg: Nsusu
kk: Тауық
km: کۄکَر
kn: ಕೋಳಿ
ko: 닭
ku: Mirîşk
ky: Tooк
la: Gallus
lb: Hong
li: Hoon
ln: Nsósó
lo: ໄກ່
lt: Višta
lv: vista
mk: кокошка
ml: കോഴി
mr: कोंबडी
ms: Ayam
nb: høns
ne: कुखुरा
nl: kippen, kip
nn: høns
nv: Naaʼahóóhai
ny: Nkhuku
pa: ਕੁੱਕੜ
pl: Kurczaki, kurczak, kura, kur, kurczaków, kurcząt, kurczęta
pt: galinha
qu: Wallpa
ro: pui, găină
ru: курица
rw: Inkoko
sc: Pudda
sd: ڪڪڙ
sh: kokoš
sk: Kura
sl: kokoš
sn: Huku
so: Dooro
sq: Pula
sr: кокошка
su: Hayam
sv: kyckling, tamhöna, broiler
sw: Kuku
ta: கோழி
te: కోడి
tg: Мурғ
th: ไก่
tl: Manok
tr: Tavuk
tt: Өй тавыгы
uk: курка
ur: مرغی
uz: Tovuq
vi: gà
vo: gok
wa: Poye
wo: Ganaar
xh: Inkuku
yi: האן
za: Gaeq
zh: 鸡

en: free range chicken
da: fritgående høns
de: Freilandhühner, Freilandhühnern, Hühner aus Freilandhaltung
es: pollo de corral
fr: poulet élevé en plein air
hr: piletina slobodnog uzgoja
it: pollo ruspante

en: traditional free-range chicken, farm reared chicken, farm raised chicken
de: Huhn aus Freilandhaltung
fr: poulet fermier, poulet fermier élevé en plein air
hr: tradicionalni slobodni uzgoj piletine

en: whole chicken, whole chickens
fr: poulet entier, poulets entiers
it: pollo intero

en: chicken blood
de: Hühnerblut
es: sangre de pollo
fr: sang de poulet
hr: pileća krv
it: sangue di pollo
nl: kippensbloed
pl: krew kurczaka

en: chicken bone
de: Hühnerknochen
es: Hueso de pollo
fi: kananluu
fr: os de poulet
hr: pilleće kožice
it: osso di pollo
nl: kippenbeenderen
pl: kość z kurczaka, kości z kurczaka

en: chicken heart
bg: пилешко сърце, пилешки сърца
de: Hühnerherz, Huhnherz
es: corazón de pollo
fr: Coeur de poulet
hr: pileće srce
it: cuore di pollo
nl: kippenhart
pl: serca z kurcząt, serca z kurczaka, serce kurczaka
ro: inimă de pui
zh: 鸡心

en: chicken liver
bg: пилешки черен дроб
de: Pouletleber, Hühnerleber, Huhnleber
es: Higado de pollo
fi: kananmaksa
fr: foie de poulet
hr: pileća jetra
it: fegato di pollo
nl: kippenlever
pl: wątroba z kurczaka, wątróbka z kurczaka, wątróbki z kurczaka, wątroby z kurczaka, wątroby z kurcząt, wątroba z kurcząt
ro: ficat de pui
zh: 鸡肝

en: chicken stomach
de: Huhnmagen
it: stomaco di pollo

en: chicken neck
de: Huhnhals
it: collo di pollo

en: chicken skin
bg: пилешка кожа
de: Hähnchenhaut, Hühnchenhaut
es: piel de pollo
fi: kanannahka
fr: peau de poulet
hr: pileće kožice
it: pelle di pollo
nl: kippenvel
pl: skóra z kurczaka, skóry z kurczaka, skóry z kurcząt, skórki z kurcząt, skórki z kurczaka, skórki drobiowe z kurczaka
ro: piele de pui
sv: kycklingskinn

en: chicken meat
bg: пилешко месо
ca: carn de pollastre, carn de gallina
da: Kylling
de: Pouletfleisch, Hühnerfleisch, Hühnchenfleisch, Huhnfleisch
es: Carne de pollo
fi: kananliha
fr: viande de poulet, viande de poule
hr: pileće meso, pilećeg mesa, pileće meso I kategorije
hu: csirkehús
it: carne di pollo
ja: 鶏肉
nb: kyllingkjøtt
nl: kippenvlees
pl: Mięso z kurczaka, mięso kurczęce, mięso z kurcząt, mięso drobiowe z kurczaka, mięso kurze, mięso z kury, mięsa kurczaka, mięso kurczaka
pt: carne de frango
ro: carne de pui
ru: куриное мясо
sk: prsia kuracie
sv: kycklingkött
tr: tavuk eti
zh: 鸡肉

en: chicken meat extract
es: extracto de carne de pollo
fr: extrait de viande de poulet
hr: ekstrakt pilećeg mesa
it: estratto di carne di pollo
nl: kippenvleesextract
pl: ekstrakt mięsa kurzego
ro: extract de carne de pui
zh: 鸡肉提取物

en: mechanically separated meat of chicken
bg: пилешко механично отделено месо
es: carne de pollo separada mecanimente, carne separada mecanicamente de pollo
fr: viande de poulet séparée mécaniquement, viande séparée mécaniquement de poulet
hr: mehanički otkošeno pileće meso
it: carne di pollo separata meccanicamente
pl: mięso mechanicznie oddzielone z kurczaka, mięso oddzielone mechanicznie z kurczaka, mięso oddzielone mechanicznie z kurcząt

en: british chicken
de: britisches Huhn, britisches Hühnchen
it: pollo britannico

de: Hähnchenfleisch
fi: broilerinliha, broilerinlihaa

en: white chicken meat
fr: viande blanche de poulet
hr: bijelo pileće meso
it: carne di pollo bianca

en: roast chicken
de: Brathähnchen
fr: poulet rôti
hr: pečeno pile
it: pollo arrosto
pl: kurczak pieczony

en: precooked chicken meat
de: Vorgekochtes Hühnerfleisch
fi: esikypsennetty kananliha
fr: viande de poulet précuite
hr: prethodno kuhano pileće meso
it: carne di pollo precotta
nl: voorgekookt kippenvlees, gegaard kippenvlees

en: chicken meat including chicken juices
de: Hühnerfleisch einschließlich Hühnersäfte
it: carne di pollo compresi i succhi di pollo